Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
ARTICLE 113
APPRAISAL RIGHTS

Editor's note:

This article 113 was added in 1993. It was repealed and reenacted in 2020, resulting in the addition, relocation, or elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article 113 prior to 2020, consult the 2019 Colorado Revised Statutes and the Colorado statutory research explanatory note beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following those sections that were relocated. For a detailed comparison of this article 113, see the comparative tables located in the back of the index.

Law reviews:

For article, "Valuation of Stock in

C

losely Held

C

orporations", see 18 Colo. Law. 1731 (1989).

Section

PART 1 RIGHT TO APPRAISAL
AND PAYMENT FOR SHARES

PART 2 PROCEDURE FOR EXERCISE
OF APPRAISAL RIGHTS

PART 3 JUDICIAL APPRAISAL OF SHARES

PART 4 OTHER REMEDIES